Utah statutes.
17-36-15.   Adoption of budget -- Immunity.

(1) (a)  On or before December 31, 2014, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is not subject to the provisions of this section; and

(b)  on or after January 1, 2015, a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class is subject to the provisions of this section.

(2) (a)  On or before the last day of each fiscal period, the governing body by resolution shall adopt the budget.

(b)  A budget adopted in accordance with Subsection (2)(a) is, unless amended, in effect for the next fiscal period.

(c)  The budget officer shall:

(i)  certify a copy of the final budget, and of any subsequent budget amendment; and

(ii)  file a copy with the state auditor not later than 30 days after the day on which the governing body adopts the budget.

(d)  The budget officer shall file a certified copy of the budget in the office of the budget officer for inspection by the public during business hours.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a county officer or county employee may not file a legal action in state or federal court against the county, a department, or a county officer for any matter related to the following:

(i)  the adoption of a county budget;

(ii)  a county appropriation;

(iii)  a county personnel allocation; or

(iv)  a fund related to the county budget, a county appropriation, or a county personnel allocation.

(b)  A county or district attorney may enforce a procedural requirement that governs the adoption or approval of a budget in accordance with this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

